North Dakota, session 69, HB1572.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 11 of section 21-03-07 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
11. The governing body of any park district that constitutes a distinct municipality may
issue general obligation bonds of the park district in an amount no greater than
one percent of the assessed valuation of the taxable property in the park district, up to
a maximum of fifteen million dollars, for the purpose of providing funds to acquire, lay
out, and improve parks, parkways, boulevards, and pleasure drives, and to acquire
land for these purposes, but the. The indebtedness may not at any time exceed one
percent of the assessed valuation of the taxable property in the park district. The initial
resolution authorizing the issuance of general obligation bonds under this subsection
must be published in the official newspaper of the park district, and any owner of
taxable property within the park district may, within sixty days after publication, file with
the clerk of the park district a protest against the adoption of the resolution. Protests
must be in writing and must describe the property that is the subject of the protest. If
Page No. 1 25.0523.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
the governing body finds the protests have been signed by the owners of taxable
property having an assessed valuation equal to five percent or more of the assessed
valuation of all taxable property within the park district, as last finally equalized, all
further proceedings under the initial resolution are barred.
SECTION 2. A new section to chapter 57-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Uniform taxing district financial and property tax data reporting system - Report .
1. By January 1, 2026, the tax commissioner shall develop and implement a uniform
reporting system for taxing district financial and property tax related data to provide a
logical, consistent, and organized framework to record and report the data. At
minimum, the tax commissioner shall include the following categories of taxing district
data as part of the uniform reporting system:
a. Fund balances; and
b. Property tax levy calculation information, including information regarding:
(1) The taxable status and property valuation of property situated in the taxing
district; and
(2) The total dollar amount and number of mills levied, separated by levy
authority .
2. The tax commissioner shall request the data in subsection 1 from each taxing distric t
and specify the form and manner in which the data must be submitted. The tax
commissioner may require a taxing district to report any other information deemed
necessary by the tax commissioner to effectuate this section.
3. The taxing districts shall timely respond to the tax commissioner's request under
subsection 2 and provide the requested data without delay .
4. By July first of each year beginning in 2026, the tax commissioner shall submit to the
legislative management a written report, which must include:
a. An overview of the uniform taxing district financial and property tax data reporting
system developed and implemented under this section, including information
regarding the form and manner in which the data is required to be submitted to
the tax commissioner; and
Page No. 2 25.0523.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
b. A summary of the taxing district financial and property tax related data submitted
by the taxing districts to the tax commissioner under this section for the
preceding taxable year.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 57-20-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
57-20-04. Abstract of tax list and legislative tax relief information to be sent to tax
commissioner - Reports.
1. The county auditor, on or before December thirty-first following the levy of the taxes,
shall prepare and transmit to the tax commissioner a complete abstract of the tax list
of the auditor's county.
2. a. In addition to the tax list required in subsection 1, the county auditor, on or before
December thirty-first following the levy of the taxes, shall prepare and transmit to
the tax commissioner a:
(1) A report providing each taxing district's property valuation and property tax
levy and any other information the tax commissioner deems necessary to
prepare the report required in subsection 3.
(2) A report providing information identifying the property tax savings provided
by the state of North Dakota which have been realized by taxpayers in the
county as legislative tax relief under chapter 50 - 34 for taxable years before
2019, chapter 50 - 35 for taxable years after 2018, and chapter 15.1 - 27. For
purposes of this subdivision:
(a) Property tax savings realized by taxpayers in the county as legislative
tax relief under chapter 15.1 - 27 is determined by multiplying the
taxable value for the taxable year for each parcel located in the county
by the lesser of one hundred twenty - five mills or the sum of :
[1] The number of mills of mill levy reduction grant under chapter
57 - 64 for the 2012 taxable year; and
[2] The 2012 taxable year mill rate of the school district excluding
sixty mills.
(b) Property tax savings realized by taxpayers in the county as legislative
tax relief under chapter 50 - 35 is determined by multiplying the taxable
Page No. 3 25.0523.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
value for the taxable year for each parcel located in the county by the
number of mills of relief determined by dividing the amount calculated
in subsection 1 of section 50 - 35 - 03 for a human service zone by the
taxable value of taxable property in the zone for the taxable year.
b. For taxing districts with property in more than one county, information required
under this subsection must be collected and transmitted by the county auditor of
the county in which the main office of that taxing district is located.
3. The tax commissioner shall compile information received from the county auditors in
subsection 2 and, prepare a statewide report of property tax increase and legislative
tax relief, and submit the report to the legislative management by April first of each
year. The report must include the:
a. The annual increase in property taxes levied by each taxing district of the state
after adjusting for property that was not taxable in the preceding year and
property that is no longer taxable which was taxable in the preceding year. The
report must be provided to the legislative management by April first of each year;
b. The total property tax savings provided by the state of North Dakota which have
been realized by taxpayers in each county; and
c. The statewide total property tax savings provided by the state of North Dakota
which have been realized by taxpayers.
4. The tax commissioner shall prescribe the form and manner of providing the reports
and certifications required under this section.
5. On or before December 31, 2017, the county auditor shall provide a report to the tax
commissioner providing the information identified in subsection 2 for the 2015 and
2016 tax years.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Section 57-20-07.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
57-20-07.1. County treasurer to maildeliver real estate tax statement - Contents of
statement.
1. On or before December twenty-sixth of each year, the county treasurer shall
maildeliver a real estate tax statement to the owner of each parcel of real property
atby mail addressed to the property owner at the property owner's last-known address
Page No. 4 25.0523.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
or by email to the property owner directed with verification of receipt to an email
address at which the property owner has consented to receive the real estate tax
statement. The form of the real estate tax statement to be used in every county must
be prescribed and approved for use by the tax commissioner. The statement must be
displayed in color and provided in a manner that allows the taxpayer to retain a printed
record, or electronic record if the taxpayer consents to receive the statement by email,
of the obligation for payment of taxes and special assessments as provided in the
statement. If a parcel of real property is owned by more than one individual, the county
treasurer shall send only one statement to one of the owners of that property.
Additional copies of the tax statement will be sent to the other owners upon their
request and the furnishing of their names and addresses or email addresses to the
county treasurer. TheAfter the information identifying the property owner and parcel,
the tax statement must contain information displayed in the following order:
a. Include aThree columns showing, for the taxable year to which the tax statement
applies and the two immediately preceding taxable years, the dollar valuation of
the true and full value, taxable value, and net taxable value of the parcel as
defined by law of the property and the total mill levy applicable.
b. Include, or be accompanied by a separate sheet, with threeInformation identifying
the property tax levy against the parcel by each taxing district followed by the
consolidated tax levied against the parcel. The information must be displayed in a
textual and graphical depiction of taxes levied against each parcel and listed in:
(1) Three columns showing, for the taxable year to which the tax statement
applies and the two immediately preceding taxable years, the property tax
levy in dollars against the parcel by the county and school district and any
city or township that levied taxes against the parceleach taxing district,
excluding any amounts levied as a result of voter-approved levy authority,
which must be separately stated for each taxing district with voter-approved
levy authority.
(2) A pie chart for the taxable year to which the statement applies, which shows
the percentage of the total tax levied against the parcel by each of the
taxing districts that levied taxes against the parcel, excluding any amounts
Page No. 5 25.0523.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
levied as a result of voter-approved levy authority, which must be combined
and represented as a single item in the pie chart.
(3) A separate color to represent each taxing district and the separately stated
voter-approved levy authority, which must correspond to the color used to
identify the tax levied against the parcel in the pie chart required under
paragraph 2 .
c. Provide information identifying the property tax savings provided by the state of
North Dakota. The tax statement must include a line item that is entitled
"legislative tax relief" and identifies the dollar amount of property tax savings
realized by the taxpayer under chapter 50-34 for taxable years before 2019,
chapter 50-35 for taxable years after 2018, and chapter 15.1-27.
(1) For purposes of this subdivision, legislative tax relief under chapter 15.1-27
is determined by multiplying the taxable value for the taxable year for each
parcel shown on the tax statement by the number of mills of mill levy
reduction grant under chapter 57-64 for the 2012 taxable year plus the
number of mills determined by subtracting from the 2012 taxable year mill
rate of the school district in which the parcel is located the lesser of:
(a) Fifty mills; or
(b) The 2012 taxable year mill rate of the school district minus sixty mills.
(2) Legislative tax relief under chapter 50-35 is determined by multiplying the
taxable value for the taxable year for each parcel shown on the tax
statement by the number of mills of relief determined by dividing the amount
calculated in subsection 1 of section 50-35-03 for a human service zone by
the taxable value of taxable property in the zone for the taxable year.Three
columns showing, for the taxable year to which the tax statement applies
and the two immediately preceding taxable years, the net effective tax rate
applied to the parcel.
2. Failure of an owner to receive a statement will not relieve that owner of liability, nor
extend the discount privilege past the February fifteenth deadline.
SECTION 5. LEGISLATIVE TAX REFORM AND RELIEF ADVISORY COMMITTEE - TAX
REFORM AND RELIEF STUDY - REPORT TO LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT.
Page No. 6 25.0523.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
1. During the 2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall appoint a legislative tax
reform and relief advisory committee.
2. The committee must consist of three members of the finance and taxation standing
committee of the house of representatives and three members of the finance and
taxation standing committee of the senate, appointed by the respective majority
leaders of the house of representatives and senate. The legislative management shall
designate the chairman of the committee. The committee shall operate according to
the statutes and procedures governing the operation of other legislative management
interim committees.
3. The committee shall study tax reform and relief, including income and property tax
reform and relief. Based on information provided by the tax department and input from
local taxing districts, the committee shall:
a. Review historical income and property tax relief provided by the legislative
assembly.
b. Receive information regarding tax reform and relief legislation enacted by the
sixty-ninth legislative assembly, including:
(1) Analysis of the tax reform and relief legislation, including data regarding the
estimated and actual fiscal impact of the legislation.
(2) Information from the tax department, local taxing district representatives,
and other interested persons regarding the progress of implementing the tax
reform and relief legislation.
4. The committee shall report its findings and recommendations, together with any
legislation required to implement the recommendations, to the seventieth legislative
assembly.
SECTION 6. TAX COMMISSIONER STUDY - TAX EXEMPT PROPERTY - LEGISLATIVE
MANAGEMENT REPORT.
1. During the 2025-26 interim, the tax commissioner and state supervisor of
assessments shall, in consultation with the county directors of tax equalization and
city, county, and township assessors, compile the following data for each parcel of tax
exempt property located in the state:
a. The true and full valuation.
Page No. 7 25.0523.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
b. The county in which the parcel is located.
c. The property classification.
d. The property tax exemption under which the parcel is considered tax exempt.
2. The tax commissioner and state supervisor of assessments shall establish the
procedure by which the tax commissioner and state supervisor of assessments will
compile the data.
3. If necessary to meet the deadline to submit the report required under subsection 4, the
tax commissioner and state supervisor of assessments may develop a uniform method
to be used by the county directors of tax equalization and city, county, and township
assessors to estimate the true and full value per square foot or acre of corresponding
property classification in the county in which the property is situated for the most
recent taxable year.
4. Before July 1, 2026, the tax commissioner and state supervisor of assessments shall
submit to the legislative management a written report summarizing the information
received under this section. The report must include the total true and full valuation of
exempt property in each county, separated by property tax exemption and property
classification, a description of the uniform method to estimate the true and full value of
parcels of tax exempt property, and the number of parcels of tax exempt property in
each county for which the uniform method was applied to estimate true and full value.
Page No. 8 25.0523.03000